Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.220

Correctional facilities construction and repair—Use of general contractor/construction manager method for awarding contracts—Demonstration projects.

(1) In addition to currently authorized methods of public works contracting, and in lieu of the requirements of RCW 39.04.010 and 39.04.020 through 39.04.060, capital projects funded for over ten million dollars authorized by the legislature for the department of corrections to construct or repair facilities may be accomplished under contract using the general contractor/construction manager method described in this section. In addition, the general contractor/construction manager method may be used for up to two demonstration projects under ten million dollars for the department of corrections. Each demonstration project shall aggregate capital projects authorized by the legislature at a single site to total no less than three million dollars with the approval of the office of financial management. The department of enterprise services shall present its plan for the aggregation of projects under each demonstration project to the oversight advisory committee established under subsection (2) of this section prior to soliciting proposals for general contractor/construction manager services for the demonstration project.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "general contractor/construction manager" means a firm with which the department of enterprise services has selected and negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to be guaranteed by the firm, after competitive selection through a formal advertisement, and competitive bids to provide services during the design phase that may include life-cycle cost design considerations, value engineering, scheduling, cost estimating, constructability, alternative construction options for cost savings, and sequencing of work, and to act as the construction manager and general contractor during the construction phase. The department of enterprise services shall establish an independent oversight advisory committee with representatives of interest groups with an interest in this subject area, the department of corrections, and the private sector, to review selection and contracting procedures and contracting documents. The oversight advisory committee shall discuss and review the progress of the demonstration projects. The general contractor/construction manager method is limited to projects authorized on or before July 1, 1997.

(3) Contracts for the services of a general contractor/construction manager awarded under the authority of this section shall be awarded through a competitive process requiring the public solicitation of proposals for general contractor/construction manager services. Minority and women enterprise total project goals shall be specified in the bid instructions to the general contractor/construction manager finalists. The director of enterprise services is authorized to include an incentive clause in any contract awarded under this section for savings of either time or cost or both from that originally negotiated. No incentives granted shall exceed five percent of the maximum allowable construction cost. The director of enterprise services or his or her designee shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals considering such factors as: Ability of professional personnel; past performance in negotiated and complex projects; ability to meet time and budget requirements; location; recent, current, and projected workloads of the firm; and the concept of their proposal. After the committee has selected the most qualified finalists, these finalists shall submit sealed bids for the percent fee, which is the percentage amount to be earned by the general contractor/construction manager as overhead and profit, on the estimated maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed amount for the detailed specified general conditions work. The maximum allowable construction cost may be negotiated between the department of enterprise services and the selected firm after the scope of the project is adequately determined to establish a guaranteed contract cost for which the general contractor/construction manager will provide a performance and payment bond. The guaranteed contract cost includes the fixed amount for the detailed specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, the percent fee on the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, and sales tax. If the department of enterprise services is unable to negotiate a satisfactory maximum allowable construction cost with the firm selected that the department of enterprise services determines to be fair, reasonable, and within the available funds, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the department of enterprise services shall negotiate with the next low bidder and continue until an agreement is reached or the process is terminated. If the maximum allowable construction cost varies more than fifteen percent from the bid estimated maximum allowable construction cost due to requested and approved changes in the scope by the state, the percent fee shall be renegotiated. All subcontract work shall be competitively bid with public bid openings. Specific contract requirements for women and minority enterprise participation shall be specified in each subcontract bid package that exceeds ten percent of the department's estimated project cost. All subcontractors who bid work over two hundred thousand dollars shall post a bid bond and the awarded subcontractor shall provide a performance and payment bond for their contract amount if required by the general contractor/construction manager. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project. Bidding on subcontract work by the general contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries is prohibited. The general contractor/construction manager may negotiate with the low-responsive bidder only in accordance with RCW 39.04.015 or, if unsuccessful in such negotiations, rebid.

(4) If the project is completed for less than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost, any savings not otherwise negotiated as part of an incentive clause shall accrue to the state. If the project is completed for more than the agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost, excepting increases due to any contract change orders approved by the state, the additional cost shall be the responsibility of the general contractor/construction manager.

(5) The powers and authority conferred by this section shall be construed as in addition and supplemental to powers or authority conferred by any other law, and nothing contained in this section may be construed as limiting any other powers or authority of the department of enterprise services. However, all actions taken pursuant to the powers and authority granted to the director or the department of enterprise services under this section may only be taken with the concurrence of the department of corrections.

[ 2015 c 225 s 34; 1996 c 18 s 5; 1994 c 80 s 2; 1991 c 130 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 80: See notes following RCW 39.04.210.

Severability—1991 c 130: See note following RCW 39.04.210.